Utah statutes.
53A-13-204.   Reports as to costs of driver training programs.

A local school board seeking reimbursement shall, at the end of each school year and at other times as designated by the State Board of Education, report the following to the state superintendent of public instruction:

(1)  the costs of providing driver education including a separate accounting for:

(a)  course work; and

(b)  behind-the-wheel and observation training to students;

(2)  the costs of fees waived under Section 53A-12-103 for driver education including a separate accounting for:

(a)  course work; and

(b)  behind-the-wheel and observation training to students;

(3)  the number of students who completed driver education including a separate accounting for:

(a)  course work; and

(b)  behind-the-wheel and observation training to students;

(4)  whether or not a passing grade was received; and

(5)  any other information the State Board of Education may require for the purpose of administering this program.

